New Jersey, session 222, A3605.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2025, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 54 DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 32 Operation and Support of Educational Institutions 7601 Community Programs GRANTS-IN-AID 03-7601  Adult Activities .................................................... $1,000,000 Total Grant-in-Aid appropriation, Community Programs ...................................... $1,000,000 Grant-in Aid: 03    Larc Norcross School Special Needs Adult Program Transportation ............................................................. ($1,000,000) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.